public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi -àr, -ér, -<is>ír, -ír, -<is>ír/-ír
# themeT1 + r/a0a1a2E0E1E2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2, themeT1 + r/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
# themeT8 + o/a0a1a2E0E1E2I0J0
# themeT8 + oe/a0a1a2K0
SFX a0 Y 388
SFX a0 0 ane/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 atu/M0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ave/F0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 e [aei]r
SFX a0 0 emo/E0E1E2J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 en/J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ene/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ense [aei]r
SFX a0 0 esi/N0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 esiu/O0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 imo/E0E1E2J0 er
SFX a0 0 ion/E0E1E2J0 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 ione/K0 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 ionme/G0G1 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 isen/J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isene/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isense [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ision/J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isione/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isionse [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isié/N0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isiéu/O0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ison/J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isone/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 isonse [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ié/N0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 iéu/O0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 iónmene/G0 [^cijɉñ][aei]r
SFX a0 0 me/G0G1 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 on/E0E1E2J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 onme/G0G1 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 à/F0J0L0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 àe/F0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 è/J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ène/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 é/N0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 émoe/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ésimo/J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ésimoe/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ésitu/M0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 éu/O0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 í/N0 er
SFX a0 0 ía/F0J0L0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 íane/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 íatu/M0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 íe/F0J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 íene/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ímoe/K0 er
SFX a0 0 íu/O0 er
SFX a0 0 ò/J0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 òe/K0 [aei]r
SFX a0 0 ónmene/G0 [aei]r
SFX a0 ar ede/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar ege/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar emo/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX a0 ar en/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar endo/E0E1E2 ar
SFX a0 ar ene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ense ar
SFX a0 ar ente/T0I0 ar
SFX a0 ar ento/E0E1E2 ar
SFX a0 ar erane/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar eratu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar erave/F0 ar
SFX a0 ar eremo/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX a0 ar eren/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erense ar
SFX a0 ar eresi/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar eresiu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar erion/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erione/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erionse ar
SFX a0 ar erisen/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisense ar
SFX a0 ar erisi/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar erision/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisione/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisionse ar
SFX a0 ar erisiu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisié/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisiéu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar erison/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erisonse ar
SFX a0 ar erié/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar eriéu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar eron/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar eronse ar
SFX a0 ar erà/F0J0L0 ar
SFX a0 ar eràe/F0 ar
SFX a0 ar eràvene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erè/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erène/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar eré/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar erémoe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erémome/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar erémomene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar erésimo/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar erésimoe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erésitu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar eréu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar ería/F0J0L0 ar
SFX a0 ar eríane/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar eríatu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar eríe/F0J0 ar
SFX a0 ar eríene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar erísitu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar erò/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar eròe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ese/I0T0 ar
SFX a0 ar esto/B0I0 ar
SFX a0 ar eva/F0J0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar eve/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar evi/J0L0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar evo/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar iede/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar iege/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar ion/E0E1E2J0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a0 ar ione/K0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a0 ar ionme/G0G1 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a0 ar isen/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar isene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar isense ar
SFX a0 ar isiede/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar isiege/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar ision/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar isione/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar isionse ar
SFX a0 ar isié/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar ison/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar isone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar isonse ar
SFX a0 ar iven/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar ivene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ivense ar
SFX a0 ar ivion/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar ivione/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ivionse ar
SFX a0 ar ivié/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar iviéu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar ivon/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar ivone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ivonse ar
SFX a0 ar ié/N0 ar
SFX a0 ar iéu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar iónmene/G0 [^cijɉñ]ar
SFX a0 ar on/E0E1E2J0 ar
SFX a0 ar one/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar onme/G0G1 ar
SFX a0 ar à/E0E1E2T0 ar
SFX a0 ar àa/D0F0J0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar àane/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar àau/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar àe/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar àene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ài/J0L0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar àimo/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar àimoe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar àitu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar àmene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar àndome/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar àndomene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar àntome/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar àntomene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar ào/J0T0 ar
SFX a0 ar àone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar àrmene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar àsimo ar
SFX a0 ar àsitu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar àvane/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar àvau/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar àvene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar àvimo/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar àvimoe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar àvitu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar àvone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar è/F0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar ème/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar èmene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar èu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar é/F0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar éa/F0J0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar éane/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar éau/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar ée/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar éene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar éi/J0L0N0 ar
SFX a0 ar éimo/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar éimoe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar éitu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar émoe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar émome/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar émomene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar éndome/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar éndomene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar éntome/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar éntomene/G0 ar
SFX a0 ar éo/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar éone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ésimo ar
SFX a0 ar éu/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar évane/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar évau/O0 ar
SFX a0 ar évene/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar évimo/J0 ar
SFX a0 ar évimoe/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar évitu/M0 ar
SFX a0 ar évone/K0 ar
SFX a0 ar ò ar
SFX a0 ar ónmene/G0 ar
SFX a0 e me/G0 oe
SFX a0 e mene/G0 oe
SFX a0 e ne/K0T0 oe
SFX a0 e nte/T0I0 oe
SFX a0 e nto oe
SFX a0 e te/T0 oe
SFX a0 e u/O0 oe
SFX a0 er arane/K0 er
SFX a0 er aratu/M0 er
SFX a0 er arave/F0 er
SFX a0 er aremo/E0E1E2J0 er
SFX a0 er aren/J0 er
SFX a0 er arene/K0 er
SFX a0 er arense er
SFX a0 er aresi/N0 er
SFX a0 er aresiu/O0 er
SFX a0 er arimo/J0 er
SFX a0 er arion/J0 er
SFX a0 er arione/K0 er
SFX a0 er arionse er
SFX a0 er arisen/J0 er
SFX a0 er arisene/K0 er
SFX a0 er arisense er
SFX a0 er arisi/N0 er
SFX a0 er arision/J0 er
SFX a0 er arisione/K0 er
SFX a0 er arisionse er
SFX a0 er arisiu/O0 er
SFX a0 er arisié/N0 er
SFX a0 er arisiéu/O0 er
SFX a0 er arison/J0 er
SFX a0 er arisone/K0 er
SFX a0 er arisonse er
SFX a0 er arié/N0 er
SFX a0 er ariéu/O0 er
SFX a0 er aron/E0E1E2J0 er
SFX a0 er aronme/G0G1 er
SFX a0 er arà/F0J0L0 er
SFX a0 er aràe/F0 er
SFX a0 er aràvene/K0 er
SFX a0 er arè/J0 er
SFX a0 er arène/K0 er
SFX a0 er aré/N0 er
SFX a0 er arémoe/K0 er
SFX a0 er arémome/G0 er
SFX a0 er arémomene/G0 er
SFX a0 er arésimo/J0 er
SFX a0 er arésimoe/K0 er
SFX a0 er arésitu/M0 er
SFX a0 er aréu/O0 er
SFX a0 er arí/N0 er
SFX a0 er aría/F0J0L0 er
SFX a0 er aríane/K0 er
SFX a0 er aríatu/M0 er
SFX a0 er aríe/F0J0 er
SFX a0 er aríene/K0 er
SFX a0 er arímoe/K0 er
SFX a0 er arísitu/M0 er
SFX a0 er aríu/O0 er
SFX a0 er arò/J0 er
SFX a0 er aròe/K0 er
SFX a0 er arónmene/G0 er
SFX a0 er do/B0 uer
SFX a0 er iede/N0 er
SFX a0 er iege/N0 er
SFX a0 er ime/G0 er
SFX a0 er imo/E0E1E2J0 er
SFX a0 er ion/E0E1E2J0 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a0 er ione/K0 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a0 er ionme/G0G1 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a0 er isen/J0 er
SFX a0 er isene/K0 er
SFX a0 er isense er
SFX a0 er isiede/N0 er
SFX a0 er isiege/N0 er
SFX a0 er ision/J0 er
SFX a0 er isione/K0 er
SFX a0 er isionse er
SFX a0 er isié/N0 er
SFX a0 er ison/J0 er
SFX a0 er isone/K0 er
SFX a0 er isonse er
SFX a0 er iven/J0 er
SFX a0 er ivene/K0 er
SFX a0 er ivense er
SFX a0 er ivion/J0 er
SFX a0 er ivione/K0 er
SFX a0 er ivionse er
SFX a0 er ivié/N0 er
SFX a0 er iviéu/O0 er
SFX a0 er ivon/J0 er
SFX a0 er ivone/K0 er
SFX a0 er ivonse er
SFX a0 er ié/N0 er
SFX a0 er iéu/O0 er
SFX a0 er iónmene/G0 [^cijɉñ]er
SFX a0 er on/E0E1E2J0 er
SFX a0 er one/K0 er
SFX a0 er onme/G0G1 er
SFX a0 er udo/B0 [^u]er
SFX a0 er àndome/G0 er
SFX a0 er àndomene/G0 er
SFX a0 er àntome/G0 er
SFX a0 er àntomene/G0 er
SFX a0 er é/F0N0 er
SFX a0 er éa/F0J0N0 er
SFX a0 er éane/K0 er
SFX a0 er éau/O0 er
SFX a0 er ée/J0 er
SFX a0 er éene/K0 er
SFX a0 er éi/J0L0N0 er
SFX a0 er éimo/J0 er
SFX a0 er éimoe/K0 er
SFX a0 er éitu/M0 er
SFX a0 er émene/G0 er
SFX a0 er émoe/K0 er
SFX a0 er émome/G0 er
SFX a0 er émomene/G0 er
SFX a0 er éndome/G0 er
SFX a0 er éndomene/G0 er
SFX a0 er éntome/G0 er
SFX a0 er éntomene/G0 er
SFX a0 er éo/J0 er
SFX a0 er éone/K0 er
SFX a0 er érmene/G0 er
SFX a0 er ésimo er
SFX a0 er éu/O0 er
SFX a0 er évane/K0 er
SFX a0 er évau/O0 er
SFX a0 er évene/K0 er
SFX a0 er évimo/J0 er
