public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/test.dic
aer/a0a1a2E0E1E2.0
dixdixo/a0n0n1n2J0
intredixo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
soradixo/a0n0n1n2J0
voler/a0a1k0k1E0E1‘0.0
benvoƚer/a0a2k0k2E0E2
konstar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
óstoe/a0a1a2K0
védoe/a0a1a2K0^0=0.0,0@0
malvédoe/a0a1a2K0
ʼno/a0E0E1E2I0J0
àndoe/a0a1a2K0.0
traxando/a0E0E1E2I0J0
konveñir/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2+0*0
subvéñoe/a0a1a2K0.0
intervèño/a0E0E1E2I0J0
konvèño/a0E0E1E2I0J0+0*0
sovèño/a0E0E1E2I0J0.0
interveño/a0d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0
konveño/a0d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0+0*0
soveño/a0d0d1d2E0E1E2I0J0.0
paròlo/a0E0E1I0J0
katar/a0a1a2E0E1E2*0.0
disentir/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2
ƚaso/a0E0E2J0.0
tralasar/a0a1E0E1
tòlo/a0k0k1E0E1I0J0+0.0
coler/a0a1k0k1E0E1+0.0
tolarar/a0a1E0E1
tòƚaroe/a0a2K0
métoe/a0a1a2K0^0+0.0,0@0
malmétoe/a0a1a2K0
parmétoe/a0a1a2K0
traxmétoe/a0a1a2K0
dispenso/a0E0E1E2I0J0
oltrepasar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
trapàsoe/a0a1a2K0
aspòrtoe/a0a1a2K0
traspòrto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
senbrar/a0a1a2E0E1E2-0
soméɉoe/a0a1a2K0.0
arteñir/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2
perteñir/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2
tèñoe/a0a1a2K0.0,0@0:0
intratèñoe/a0a1a2K0
sostèñoe/a0a1a2K0
téñoe/a0a1a2K0.0,0@0:0
intratéñoe/a0a1a2K0
sostéñoe/a0a1a2K0
morir/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2^0*0
permaner/a0a1a2E0E1E2
domandar/a0a1a2E0E1E2.0
ŧérkoe/a0a1K0.0
rientro/a0E0E1E2I0J0
soravívoe/a0a1a2K0
vivàtolo/a0E0E1I0J0
vèrđoe/a0a1K0
usir/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2.0
usto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
usar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
bexoñar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
koménŧoe/a0a1K0*0
korespóndoe/a0a1a2K0
sèroe/a0a1a2K0-0
skrivo/a0E0E1E2I0J0-0.0,0
sotoskrivo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
devento/a0E0E1E2I0J0.0
subsèguoe/a0a1a2K0
prosèguoe/a0a1a2K0
rendo/a0E0E1E2I0J0@0
parkoro/a0E0E1E2I0J0
sàlvoe/a0a1a2K0.0
kamínoe/a0a1a2K0
fudir/a0a1c0c1E0E1.0
òvioe/a0a1a2K0
konđuro/a0E0E1I0J0*0
sparxúroe/a0a1a2K0
duxo/a0E0E1E2I0J0^0-0.0:0
fisar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1^0
bandono/a0E0E1E2I0J0*0@0
trasferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0
espono/a0E0E1E2I0J0
rekonpono/a0E0E1E2I0J0
dexinprimo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
salúoe/a0a1K0
audir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2
koórdeno/a0E0E1E2I0J0
sorvejo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
asumo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
proténdoe/a0a1a2K0
akuxar/a0a1a2E0E1E2s0s1
salto/a0E0E1E2I0J0.0@0)0
exultar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
kovèrxo/a0E0E1E2I0J0+0*0.0
reaseño/a0E0E1E2I0J0
véloe/a0a1K0.0
sòlvo/a0E0E1E2I0J0.0-0,0@0
suŧédoe/a0a1K0
àbito/a0E0E1E2I0J0+0
ligo/a0E0E1I0J0+0*0<0<1
òbligoe/a0a1a2K0
maltratar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
benservir/a0a1a2d0d1d2E0E1E2
dexdóndoe/a0a1K0
raxónxoe/a0a1a2K0
farmar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
sàloe/a0a1K0=0-0.0,0
ƚaorar/a0a2E0E2
lavorato/a0E0E1I0J0
lèđo/a0E0E1I0J0.0
dorménsoe/a0a1a2K0-0
arbàsoe/a0a1a2K0
spéndoe/a0a1a2K0.0
realixar/a0a1E0E1
estèrmino/a0E0E1E2I0J0
konsídaroe/a0a1a2K0.0
kontramandar/a0a1a2E0E1E2.0,0
inŧídoe/a0a1K0
osèrvoe/a0a1a2K0
mostro/a0E0E1E2I0J0r2+0,0
kóntoe/a0a1a2K0*0
xbevàcoe/a0a1a2K0
kanbiar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0*0.0
poxo/a0E0E1E2I0J0=0*0.0
ferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0^0-0.0,0@0:0
sorvejar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
inespedir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2
rónpoe/a0a1a2K0,0
dexíderoe/a0a1a2K0
vòlxo/a0E0E1E2I0J0=0+0-0*0.0
dúdigoe/a0a1K0^0
xudegar/a0a1a2E0E1E2^0
veŧino/a0E0E1I0J0
exòrtoe/a0a1a2K0
ínputoe/a0a1a2K0
tajo/a0E0E1E2I0J0+0-0.0,0
taɉúsoe/a0a1a2K0*0
kanpar/a0a1a2E0E1E2*0,0
istuar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
travarso/a0E0E1E2I0J0-0
súparo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
vòltoe/a0a1a2K0‘0+0-0*0.0
arvoltolar/a0a1E0E1
pròvoko/a0E0E1E2I0J0
traspianto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
repètoe/a0a1a2K0
inkontro/a0E0E1E2I0J0
akòrdo/a0E0E1I0J0-0
skòrxoe/a0a1a2K0
tiro/a0E0E1E2I0J0+0*0.0
nòtoe/a0a1a2K0+0,0
malđontar/a0a1E0E1
retroŧédoe/a0a1K0
pagar/a0a1a2E0E1E2r0=0.0@0*0
sustento/a0E0E1E2I0J0
pòrtoe/a0a1a2K0=0-0.0,0@0:0
kontrapexar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
dòparo/a0E0E1E2I0J0
kontrobato/a0E0E1E2I0J0
piànđoe/a0a1K0
pianxòto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
rađíroe/a0a1K0
eƚevar/a0a2E0E2
taxentar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
konvínsoe/a0a1a2K0.0
manifèsto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
proklàmoe/a0a1a2K0
đogatolar/a0a1E0E1T4
insisto/a0E0E1E2I0J0
tèrmenoe/a0a1a2K0+0*0,0
konparir/a0a1a2e0e1e2E0E1E2+0.0*0
mèretoe/a0a1a2K0
komensar/a0a1a2E0E1E2v0*0
iniŧio/a0E0E1I0J0
konfèsoe/a0a1a2K0
malagrasiar/a0a1E0E1
ringrasio/a0E0E1E2I0J0
voƚar/a0a2E0E2-0*0
trasferir/a0a1a2c0c1c2E0E1E2r0
organédoe/a0a1K0
perfumar/a0a1a2E0E1E2
còpo/a0E0E1E2I0J0*0
armiđar/a0a1E0E1+0
brústoloe/a0a1K0
sorabóndoe/a0a1a2K0
pekar/a0a1a2E0E1E2	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
